test/tools/fsmbook-tests/lexc-files/EsperantoNounsAndAdjectives.lexc
LEXICON Root
	Nouns ;
	Adjectives ;

LEXICON Nouns
	NounRoots ;
ge	NounRoots ;

LEXICON NounRoots
bird	Nmf ;
hund	Nmf ;
kat	Nmf ;
elefant	Nmf ;

LEXICON Nmf
in	Nmf ;
et	Nmf ;
eg	Nmf ;
	Nend ;
	Adjend ;

LEXICON Nend
o	Number ;

LEXICON Adjectives
	AdjPrefixes ;
	AdjRoots ;

LEXICON AdjPrefixes
mal	AdjRoots ;
ne	AdjRoots ;

LEXICON AdjRoots
bon	Adj ;
long	Adj ;
jun	Adj ;
alt	Adj ;
grav	Adj ;

LEXICON Adj
eg	Adj ;
et	Adj ;
	Adjend ;
ec	Nend ;

LEXICON Adjend
a	Number ;

LEXICON Number
j	Case ;
	Case ;

LEXICON Case
n	# ;
	# ;
